test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-T-A-ikakomimm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Verb - ikákomimm - ok : # -m animate transitive verb, love AEW NA1
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kitsikákomimmo
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nitsikákomimmawa
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+1Sg+4SgO: nitsikákomimmayini
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kitsikákomimmoki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kitsikákomimmawa
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+2Sg+4SgO: kitsikákomimmayini
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO: nitsikákomimmoka
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kitsikákomimmoka
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+3Sg+4SgO: ikákomimmiiwa
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+4Sg+3SgO: otsikákomimmoki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+4Sg+2SgO: kitsikákomimmokini
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+4Sg+1SgO: nitsikákomimmokini
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+5Sg/PlO: ikákomimmiiyiina
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4SgO: osikákomimmokini
     
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kitsikákomimmohpinnaana
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: nitsikákomimmannaani
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+1Pl+4PlO: nitsikákomimmannaani
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+21Pl+3PlO: ikákomimmayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+21Pl+4PlO: ikákomimmayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kitsikákomimmokihpinnaana
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kitsikákomimmawaayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+2Pl+4PlO: kitsikákomimmawaayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: nitsikákomimmokinnaani
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kitsikákomimmokoaayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+3Pl+4PlO: ikákomimmiiyi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+1PlO: nitsikákomimmokinnani
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+2PlO: kitsikákomimmokoaayini
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+3PlO: otsikákomimmokoaayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+5Sg/PlO: kitsikákomimmokoaayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4PlO: otsikákomimmokoaayini
     
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kitsikákomimmohpinnaana
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: nitsikákomimmannaana
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+1Pl+4SgO: nitsikákomimmannaanina
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+21Pl+3SgO: ikákomimmawa
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+21Pl+4SgO: ikákomimmayini
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kitsikákomimmokihpoaawa
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kitsikákomimmawaawa
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+2Pl+4SgO: kitsikákomimmawaayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: nitsikákomimmoki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: kitsikákomimmoki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+3Pl+4SgO: ikákomimmiiyi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+1SgO: nitsikákomimmoki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+2SgO: kitsikákomimmoki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+4Pl+3SgO: otsikákomimmoka

     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kitsikákomimmohpoaawa     
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: nitsikákomimmayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+1Sg+4PlO: nitsikákomimmayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kitsikákomimmokihpinnaana    
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kitsikákomimmayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+2Sg+4PlO: kitsikákomimmayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+3Sg+1PlO: nitsikákomimmokinnaani
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kitsikákomimmokoaawa
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+3Sg+4PlO: ikákomimmiiwa
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+4Sg+1PlO: nitsikákomimmokini
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+4Sg+2PlO: kitsikákomimmokini
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+4Sg+3PlO: otsikákomimmokoaayi
 
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+1SgO: nitsikákomimmokoo
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+1PlO: nitsikákomimmotsspinnaana
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+2SgO: kitsikákomimmokoo
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+2PlO: kitsikákomimmotsspoaawa
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+21SgO: ikákomimmokiwa
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+3SgO: ikákomimmawa
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+3PlO: ikákomimmayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+4SgO: ikákomimmayini
     ikákomimm+VTA+Ind+Unspec+4SgO: ikákomimmayi

     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: kitsikákomimmohsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: nitsikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+4SgO: nitsikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: kitsikákomimmokssi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: kitsikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+4SgO: kitsikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+1SgO: nitsikákomimmssi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: kitsikákomimmssi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+4SgO: otsikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+4Sg+3SgO: otsikákomimmssi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+4Sg+4SgO: otsikákomimmssi

     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: kitsikákomimmohsoaayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: nitsikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+4PlO: nitsikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: kitsikákomimmokssinnani
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: kitsikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+4PlO: kitsikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: nitsikákomimmssinnani
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: otsikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+4PlO: otsikákomimmssi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+4Sg+3PlO: otsikákomimmssi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+4Sg+4PlO: otsikákomimmssi

     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: kitsikákomimmohsinnani
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: nitsikákomimmahsinnaani
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+4PlO: nitsikákomimmahsinnaani
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+3PlO: ikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+4PlO: ikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: kitsikákomimmokssinnani
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: kitsikákomimmahsoaayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+4PlO: kitsikákomimmahsoaayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: nitsikákomimmssinnani
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+21PlO: nitsikákomimmokssi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: otsikákomimmssoaayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+4PlO: otsikákomimmssi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+4Pl+4PlO: otsikákomimmssi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+4Pl+3PlO: otsikákomimmssi

     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: kitsikákomimmohsinnani
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: nitsikákomimmahsinnaani
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+4SgO: nitsikákomimmahsinnaanini
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+3SgO: ikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+4SgO: ikákomimmahsini
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: kitsikákomimmokssoaayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: kitsikákomimmahsoaayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+4SgO: kitsikákomimmahsoaayini
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: nitsikákomimmssinnani
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+21SgO: nitsikákomimmokssi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: kitsikákomimmssi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+4SgO: otsikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+4Pl+4SgO: otsikákomimmssi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+4Pl+3SgO: otsikákomimmssi

     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+1SgO: nitsikákomimmokoohsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+1PlO: nitsikákomimmotssinnaana
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+2SgO: kitsikákomimmokoohsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+2PlO: kitsikákomimmotssoaayi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+21SgO: ikákomimmotssi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+3SgO: ikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+3PlO: ikákomimmahsi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+4SgO: ikákomimmahsini
     ikákomimm+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+4SgO: ikákomimmahsi

     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+2SgO: ikákomimminiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+3SgO: ikákomimmaniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+4SgO: ikákomimmaniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+1SgO: ikákomimmokiiniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+3SgO: ikákomimmaniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+4SgO: ikákomimmaniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+1SgO: ikákomimmotsiiniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+2SgO: ikákomimmotsiiniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+4SgO: ikákomimmasi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+4Sg+3SgO: ikákomimmotsiiniki

     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+2PlO: ikákomimminoaiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+3PlO: ikákomimmainiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+1PlO: ikákomimmokinnaaniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+3PlO: ikákomimmainiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+1PlO: ikákomimmokinnaaniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+21PlO: ikákomimmokisi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+2PlO: ikákomimmotsinoainiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+4PlO: ikákomimmasi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+4Sg+3PlO: ikákomimmotsiinoainiki

     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Pl+2PlO: ikákomimminnaaniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Pl+3PlO: ikákomimmainnaaniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Pl+1PlO: ikákomimmokinnaaniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Pl+3PlO: ikákomimmainainiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+1PlO: ikákomimmotsiinoainiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+21PlO: ikákomimmokisi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+2PlO: ikákomimmotsinoainiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+4PlO: ikákomimmasi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+4Pl+3PlO: ikákomimmotsiiniki

     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Pl+2SgO: ikákomimminoainiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Pl+3SgO: ikákomimmainiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+21Pl+3SgO: ikákomimmahki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Pl+1SgO: ikákomimmokiinoainiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Pl+3SgO: ikákomimmainiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+1SgO: ikákomimmotsiiniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+21SgO: ikákomimmokisi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+2SgO: ikákomimmotsiiniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+4SgO: ikákomimmasi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+4Pl+3SgO: ikákomimmotsiinoainiki

     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Pl+2SgO: ikákomimminoaiiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+1Pl+3SgO: ikákomimmainiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+21Pl+3SgO: ikákomimmahki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Pl+1SgO: ikákomimmokiinoainiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+2Pl+3SgO: ikákomimmainiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+1SgO: ikákomimmotsiiniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+21SgO: ikákomimmokisi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+2SgO: ikákomimmotsiiniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+3Pl+4SgO: ikákomimmasi
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+4Pl+3SgO: ikákomimmotsiinoainiki

     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+1SgO: ikákomimmokoiniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+1PlO: ikákomimmokoinnaaniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+2SgO: ikákomimmokoiniki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+2PlO: ikákomimmokoinoainiki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+21SgO: ikákomimmotsski
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+3SgO: ikákomimmahki
     ikákomimm+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+3PlO: ikákomimmahki

     ikákomimm+VTA+Imp+2Sg+1SgO: ikákomimmokit
     ikákomimm+VTA+Imp+2Sg+1PlO: ikákomimmaokinnaana
     ikákomimm+VTA+Imp+2Sg+3SgO: ikákomimmis
     ikákomimm+VTA+Imp+2Sg+3PlO: ikákomimmis
     ikákomimm+VTA+Imp+2Pl+1SgO: ikákomimmokik
     ikákomimm+VTA+Imp+2Pl+1PlO: ikákomimmaokinnaana
     ikákomimm+VTA+Imp+2Pl+3SgO: ikákomimmok
     ikákomimm+VTA+Imp+2Pl+3PlO: ikákomimmok

     ikákomimm+VTA+Der/Rcpr+VAI+Ind+1Pl: nitsikákomimmotsiiyihpinnaan
     
